Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-517
Improvements; costs borne by district.

All costs of the improvement other than the costs to be covered by special assessments as finally determined shall be borne by the sanitary district.

Laws 1927, c. 144, § 2, p. 392;

C.S.1929, § 31-612;

Laws 1933, c. 136, § 26, p. 539;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 31-612;

R.S.1943, § 31-517.